Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other law limiting  expenditures, the following amounts
are established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, as the maximum limits for payment
of expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts, but  ex-
cluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected  or received by the Oregon Liquor Control
Commission, for the following purposes:
(1) Administrative expenses ........... $ 69,069,457
(2) Marijuana regulation ................ $ 14,483,634
(3) Agents’ compensation ............... $123,927,415
(4) Capital improvements ............... $ 227,943
SECTION 2. For the biennium beginning July 1, 2017, expenditures by  the Oregon Liquor
Control Commission for liquor purchases are not limited.
SECTION 3. This 2017 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2017 Act takes effect
July 1, 2017.
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 22, 2017
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 29, 2017
..................................................................................
Peter Courtney, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Kate Brown, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2017
..................................................................................
Dennis Richardson, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5019 (HB 5019-A) Page 2